Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2796.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0922, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Essential community supports. (a) The purpose of the essential community supports program is to provide targeted services to persons age 65 and older who need essential community support, but whose needs do not meet the level of care required for nursing facility placement under section 144.0724, subdivision 11. (b) Essential community supports are available not to exceed deleted text begin $400deleted text end new text begin $.......new text end per person per month. Essential community supports may be used as authorized within an authorization period not to exceed 12 months. Services must be available to a person who: (1) is age 65 or older; (2) is not eligible for medical assistance; (3) has received a community assessment under section 256B.0911, subdivisions 17 to 21, 23, 24, or 27, and does not require the level of care provided in a nursing facility; (4) meets the financial eligibility criteria for the alternative care program under section 256B.0913, subdivision 4; (5) has an assessment summary; and (6) has been determined by a community assessment under section 256B.0911, subdivisions 17 to 21, 23, 24, or 27, to be a person who would require provision of at least one of the following services, as defined in the approved elderly waiver plan, in order to maintain their community residence: (i) adult day services; (ii) caregiver support; (iii) homemaker support; (iv) chores; (v) a personal emergency response device or system; (vi) home-delivered meals; or (vii) community living assistance as defined by the commissioner. (c) The person receiving any of the essential community supports in this subdivision must also receive service coordination, not to exceed deleted text begin $600deleted text end new text begin $.......new text end in a 12-month authorization period, as part of their assessment summary. (d) A person who has been determined to be eligible for essential community supports must be reassessed at least annually and continue to meet the criteria in paragraph (b) to remain eligible for essential community supports. (e) The commissioner is authorized to use federal matching funds for essential community supports as necessary and to meet demand for essential community supports as outlined in subdivision 2, and that amount of federal funds is appropriated to the commissioner for this purpose. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [256B.485] WAIVER CASE MANAGEMENT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Applicability. new text end new text begin This section applies to all waiver case management services provided under sections 256B.0913, 256B.092, 256B.0922, and 256B.49, and chapter 256S. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Case management labor market analysis. new text end new text begin (a) County agencies must submit case management labor market data and the data of their contracted providers to the commissioner annually according to timelines specified by the commissioner. The commissioner must compile, summarize, analyze, and publicly post annual updates on the data department's website. The commissioner must include in the annual updates an analysis of the case management labor market trends statewide and by county. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of the case management labor market analysis required under this subdivision, each county agency must submit the following data in a form and manner determined by the commissioner: new text end new text begin (1) number of case managers directly employed by the county agency; new text end new text begin (2) number of private agencies under contract with the county agency to provide case management; new text end new text begin (3) number of case managers employed by the private agencies under contract with the county agency; new text end new text begin (4) wages of case managers, by employer; new text end new text begin (5) overtime wages of case managers, by employer; new text end new text begin (6) average hours worked by case managers, by employer; new text end new text begin (7) number of billable hours submitted, by employer; new text end new text begin (8) average caseload, by employer; new text end new text begin (9) total number of individuals served directly by the county agency and by each private agency under contract with the county agency; new text end new text begin (10) employee benefits provided to case managers, by employer; new text end new text begin (11) summary data as defined in section 13.02 on the demographic characteristics of all case managers, not by employer; new text end new text begin (12) total number of case management job vacancies, by employer; and new text end new text begin (13) case management tenure and turnover rates, by employer. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Annual rate review. new text end new text begin The commissioner must engage with counties and interested community members to review rates on an annual basis and request input on recommendations prior to finalization of any recommendations the commissioner chooses to make to the legislature regarding waiver case management rates. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin WAIVER CASE MANAGEMENT RATE INCREASE.new text end new text begin The rates for waiver case management services provided under Minnesota Statutes, sections 256B.0913, 256B.092, 256B.0922, and 256B.49, and Minnesota Statutes, chapter 256S, are increased by 27.5 percent from the rates in effect on June 30, 2025. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, and applies to services provided on or after that date. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin MONTHLY CASE MIX BUDGET CAP INCREASES.new text end new text begin To accommodate a waiver case management services rate increase of 27.5 percent, the monthly case mix budget caps under Minnesota Statutes, sections 256S.18 and 256S.19, are increased by ... percent. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER OF HUMAN SERVICES; STATEWIDE WAVIER CASE MANAGEMENT RATE METHODOLOGY.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must develop recommendations for a statewide rate methodology for waiver case management services provided under Minnesota Statutes, sections 256B.0913, 256B.092, 256B.0922, and 256B.49, and Minnesota Statutes, chapter 256S. The commissioner must engage with county agencies and interested community members to identify priorities for rate setting, collect cost data, and request input on recommendations prior to finalizing the commissioner's recommendations. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may include the following variables in setting the rate methodology: new text end new text begin (1) prevailing wages; new text end new text begin (2) recruitment costs; new text end new text begin (3) employee-related expenses; new text end new text begin (4) paid time off and training; new text end new text begin (5) supervision and span of control; new text end new text begin (6) distribution of time; new text end new text begin (7) general and administrative expenses; new text end new text begin (8) travel and mileage expenses; new text end new text begin (9) nonbillable time; new text end new text begin (10) absence days; new text end new text begin (11) program support expenses; new text end new text begin (12) caseload sizes; and new text end new text begin (13) culturally specific program factors as described in Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.076, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may also recommend modifications to county and state duties and responsibilities related to waiver case management, case load sizes, and quality assurance. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must submit recommendations to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over home and community-based waiver case management services by February 1, 2026. new text end